Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-110.03
Emergency response provider, defined.

Emergency response provider shall mean a person responding to a mutual aid agreement or a state of emergency proclamation issued by the Governor or the President of the United States who is temporarily assigned by a governmental or nongovernmental relief agency or employer to provide support to victims of an emergency or a natural disaster or to rebuild the infrastructure of an area affected by such emergency or natural disaster.

Laws 2022, LB843, § 4.